Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.42.230

Bureaus—Number—Powers.

An alien bank may have as many bureaus in this state as the director will authorize. A bureau in this state may provide information about services offered by the alien bank, its subsidiaries and affiliates and may gather and provide business and economic information. A bureau may not take deposits, make loans or transact other commercial or banking business in this state.

[ 1994 c 92 s 95; 1973 1st ex.s. c 53 s 23. Formerly RCW 30.42.230.]